Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-102
Money; demand expressed in another denomination; effect.

The provisions of section 58-101 shall not in any manner affect any demand expressed in money of another denomination; but such demand, in any suit or proceeding affecting the same, shall be reduced to the denominations in that section given.

R.S.1866, c. 37, § 2, p. 269;

R.S.1913, § 4016;

C.S.1922, § 3419;

C.S.1929, § 58-102;

R.S.1943, § 58-102.